Utah statutes.
78B-6-1508.   Effective date.

This part shall apply to any transfer of structured settlement payment rights under a transfer agreement entered into on or after May 6, 2002; provided, however, that nothing contained in this part shall imply that any transfer under a transfer agreement reached prior to that date is either effective or ineffective.

